Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA ENERGY ALLEY.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account in the special revenue fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Clean Energy Economy Minnesota for the Minnesota Energy Alley initiative to secure the state's energy and economic development future. The money from the grant may be used to establish and support the initiative, provide seed funding for businesses, develop a training and development program, support recruitment of entrepreneurs to Minnesota, and secure funding from federal programs and corporate partners to establish a self-sustaining, long-term revenue model. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end